Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5785.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The legislature finds that postsecondary education is critical for the economic mobility of Washingtonians. The Washington college grant established an entitlement program to provide financial aid for low-income students. It is the intent of the legislature to continue assessing state financial aid offered to students attending institutions of higher education across all sectors in Washington in order to serve students pursuing postsecondary education. Further, it is the intent to continue assessing the college bound program available to students attending institutions of higher education across all sectors in Washington. Sec. 2. RCW 28B.92.030 and 2022 c 166 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(1) "Council" means the student achievement council.(2) "Financial aid" means either loans, grants, or both, to students who demonstrate financial need enrolled or accepted for enrollment as a student at institutions of higher education.(3) "Financial need" means a demonstrated financial inability to bear the total cost of education as directed in rule by the office.(4) "Institution" or "institutions of higher education" means:(a) Any public university, college, community college, or technical college operated by the state of Washington or any political subdivision thereof; or(b) Any other university, college, school, or institute in the state of Washington offering instruction beyond the high school level that is a member institution of an accrediting association recognized by rule of the council for the purposes of this section and that agrees to and complies with program rules adopted pursuant to RCW 28B.92.150. However, any institution, branch, extension or facility operating within the state of Washington that is affiliated with an institution operating in another state must be:(i) A separately accredited member institution of any such accrediting association;(ii) A branch of a member institution of an accrediting association recognized by rule of the council for purposes of this section, that is eligible for federal student financial aid assistance and has operated as a nonprofit college or university delivering on-site classroom instruction for a minimum of ((twenty))20 consecutive years within the state of Washington, and has an annual enrollment of at least ((seven hundred))700 full-time equivalent students;(iii) A nonprofit institution recognized by the state of Washington as provided in RCW 28B.77.240; or(iv) An approved apprenticeship program under chapter 49.04 RCW.(5) "Maximum Washington college grant":(a) For students attending two or four-year institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016, is tuition and estimated fees for ((fifteen))15 quarter credit hours or the equivalent, as determined by the office, including operating fees, building fees, and services and activities fees.(b) For students attending private four-year not-for-profit institutions of higher education in Washington((, in)):(i) In the 2019-20 academic year, is ((nine thousand seven hundred thirty-nine dollars))$9,739 and may increase each year afterwards by no more than the tuition growth factor through the end of the 2025-26 academic year; and(ii) Beginning in the 2026-27 academic year, is 50 percent of the average of awards for the same academic year granted to students at the public research institutions in Washington.(c) For students attending two-year private not-for-profit institutions of higher education in Washington, in the 2019-20 academic year, is ((three thousand six hundred ninety-four dollars))$3,694 and may increase each year afterwards by no more than the tuition growth factor.(d) For students attending four-year private for-profit institutions of higher education in Washington, in the 2019-20 academic year, is eight thousand five hundred seventeen dollars and may increase each year afterwards by no more than the tuition growth factor, until the end of the 2025-26 academic year.(e) For students attending two-year private for-profit institutions of higher education in Washington, in the 2019-20 academic year, is two thousand eight hundred twenty-three dollars and may increase each year afterwards by no more than the tuition growth factor, until the end of the 2025-26 academic year.(f) For students attending Western Governors University-Washington, as established in RCW 28B.77.240((, in)):(i) In the 2019-20 academic year, is ((five thousand six hundred nineteen dollars))$5,619 and may increase each year afterwards by no more than the tuition growth factor through the 2025-26 academic year; and(ii) Beginning in the 2026-27 academic year, is $4,150 and may increase each year afterwards by no more than the tuition growth factor.(((g)))(e) For students attending approved apprenticeship programs((, beginning in)):(i) In the 2022-23 academic year, is the same amount as the maximum Washington college grant for students attending two-year institutions of higher education as defined in (a) of this subsection to be used for tuition and fees, program supplies and equipment, and other costs that facilitate educational endeavors through the 2025-26 academic year; and(ii) Beginning in the 2026-27 academic year, is 50 percent of the maximum Washington college grant award for students attending two-year institutions of higher education as defined in (a) of this subsection to be used for tuition and fees, program supplies and equipment, and other costs that facilitate educational endeavors.(6) "Office" means the office of student financial assistance.(7) "Tuition growth factor" means an increase of no more than the average annual percentage growth rate of the median hourly wage for Washington for the previous ((fourteen))14 years as the wage is determined by the federal bureau of labor statistics.Sec. 3. RCW 28B.92.205 and 2023 c 475 s 923 are each amended to read as follows:In addition to other eligibility requirements outlined in this chapter, students who demonstrate financial need are eligible to receive the Washington college grant. ((Financial need is as follows:(1) Until academic year 2020-21, students with family incomes between zero and fifty percent of the state median family income, adjusted for family size, shall receive the maximum Washington college grant as defined in RCW 28B.92.030. Grants for students with incomes between fifty-one and seventy percent of the state median family income, adjusted for family size, shall be prorated at the following percentages of the maximum Washington college grant amount:(a) Seventy percent for students with family incomes between fifty-one and fifty-five percent of the state median family income;(b) Sixty-five percent for students with family incomes between fifty-six and sixty percent of the state median family income;(c) Sixty percent for students with family incomes between sixty-one and sixty-five percent of the state median family income; and(d) Fifty percent for students with family incomes between sixty-six and seventy percent of the state median family income.(2) Beginning with academic year 2020-21, except during the 2022-23, 2023-24, and 2024-25 academic years))Beginning with the 2025-26 academic year, students with family incomes between zero and ((fifty-five))60 percent of the state median family income, adjusted for family size, shall receive the maximum Washington college grant as defined in RCW 28B.92.030. ((During the 2022-23, 2023-24, and 2024-25 academic years, students with family incomes between zero and sixty percent of the state median family income, adjusted for family size, shall receive the maximum Washington college grant.)) Grants for students with incomes between ((fifty-six))61 and ((one hundred))100 percent of the state median family income, adjusted for family size, shall be prorated at the following percentages of the maximum Washington college grant amount:(((a) Seventy percent for students with family incomes between fifty-six and sixty percent of the state median family income, except during the 2022-23, 2023-24, and 2024-25 academic years;(b) Sixty))(1) 60 percent for students with family incomes between ((sixty-one))61 and ((sixty-five))65 percent of the state median family income((, except during the 2023-24 and 2024-25 academic years when student grant award shall not be prorated and students shall receive the maximum award));(((c) Fifty))(2) 50 percent for students with family incomes between ((sixty-six))66 and ((seventy))70 percent of the state median family income;(((d) Twenty-four and one-half))(3) 24.5 percent for students with family incomes between ((seventy-one))71 and ((seventy-five))75 percent of the state median family income; and(((e) Ten))(4) 10 percent for students with family incomes between ((seventy-six))76 and ((one hundred))100 percent of the state median family income.Sec. 4. RCW 28B.118.010 and 2024 c 323 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:The office of student financial assistance shall design the Washington college bound scholarship program in accordance with this section and in alignment with the Washington college grant program in chapter 28B.92 RCW unless otherwise provided in this section. The right of an eligible student to receive a college bound scholarship vest upon enrollment in the program that is earned by meeting the requirements of this section as it exists at the time of the student's enrollment under subsection (2) of this section.(1) "Eligible students" are those students who:(a) Qualify for free or reduced-price lunches.(i) If a student qualifies in the seventh or eighth grade, the student remains eligible even if the student does not receive free or reduced-price lunches thereafter.(ii) Beginning in the 2019-20 academic year, if a student qualifies for free or reduced-price lunches in the ninth grade and was previously ineligible during the seventh or eighth grade while he or she was a student in Washington, the student is eligible for the college bound scholarship program;(b) Are dependent pursuant to chapter 13.34 RCW and:(i) In grade seven through 12; or(ii) Are between the ages of 18 and 21 and have not graduated from high school; or(c) Were dependent pursuant to chapter 13.34 RCW and were adopted between the ages of 14 and 18 with a negotiated adoption agreement that includes continued eligibility for the Washington state college bound scholarship program pursuant to RCW 74.13A.025.(2)(a) Every eligible student shall be automatically enrolled by the office of student financial assistance, with no action necessary by the student, student's family, or student's guardians.(b) Eligible students and the students' parents or guardians shall be notified of the student's enrollment in the Washington college bound scholarship program and the requirements for award of the scholarship by the office of student financial assistance. To the maximum extent practicable, an eligible student must acknowledge enrollment in the college bound scholarship program and receipt of the requirements for award of the scholarship.(c) The office of the superintendent of public instruction and the department of children, youth, and families must provide the office of student financial assistance with a list of eligible students when requested. The office of student financial assistance must determine the most effective methods, including timing and frequency, to notify eligible students of enrollment in the Washington college bound scholarship program. The office of student financial assistance must take reasonable steps to ensure that eligible students acknowledge enrollment in the college bound scholarship program and receipt of the requirements for award of the scholarship. The office of student financial assistance shall also make available to every school district information, brochures, and posters to increase awareness and to enable school districts to notify eligible students directly or through school teachers, counselors, or school activities.(3) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, an eligible student must:(a)(i) Graduate from a public high school under RCW 28A.150.010, an approved private high school under chapter 28A.195 RCW in Washington, or have received home-based instruction under chapter 28A.200 RCW; and(ii) For eligible students enrolling in a postsecondary educational institution for the first time beginning with the 2023-24 academic year, graduate with at least a "C" average for consideration of direct admission to a public or private four-year institution of higher education;(b) Have no felony convictions;(c) Be a resident student as defined in RCW 28B.15.012(2) (a) through (e); and(d) Have a family income that does not exceed 65 percent of the state median family income at the time of high school graduation.(4)(a) An eligible student who is a resident student under RCW 28B.15.012(2)(e) must also provide the institution, as defined in RCW 28B.15.012, an affidavit indicating that the individual will file an application to become a permanent resident at the earliest opportunity the individual is eligible to do so and a willingness to engage in any other activities necessary to acquire citizenship, including but not limited to citizenship or civics review courses.(b) For eligible students as defined in subsection (1)(b) and (c) of this section, a student may also meet the requirement in subsection (3)(a) of this section by receiving a high school equivalency certificate as provided in RCW 28B.50.536.(5)(a) For students attending two or four-year institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016, the value of the award shall be (i) the difference between the student's tuition and required fees, less the value of any state-funded grant, scholarship, or waiver assistance the student receives; (ii) plus ((five hundred dollars))$500 for books and materials.(b)(i) For students attending private four-year institutions of higher education in Washington, the award amount shall be the ((representative)) average of awards granted to students in public research universities in Washington or the ((representative)) average of awards granted to students in public research universities in Washington in the 2014-15 academic year, whichever is greater, through the 2026-27 academic year.(ii) Beginning in the 2027-28 academic year, for students attending private four-year not-for-profit institutions of higher education in Washington, the award amount shall be 50 percent of the average of awards for the same academic year granted to students in public research universities in Washington.(c)(i) For students attending private vocational schools in Washington, the award amount shall be the ((representative)) average of awards granted to students in public community and technical colleges in Washington or the ((representative)) average of awards granted to students in public community and technical colleges in Washington in the 2014-15 academic year, whichever is greater, through the 2026-27 academic year.(ii) Beginning in the 2027-28 academic year, for students attending two-year private not-for-profit schools in Washington, the award amount shall be the average of awards granted in the same academic year to students in public community and technical colleges in Washington, or the average of awards granted to students in public community and technical colleges in Washington in the 2014-15 academic year, whichever is greater.(d) Beginning in the 2027-28 academic year, for students attending Western Governors University-Washington, as established in RCW 28B.77.240, the award shall be $4,650.(6) Eligible students must enroll no later than the fall term, as defined by the institution of higher education, one academic year following high school graduation. College bound scholarship eligibility may not extend beyond six years or 150 percent of the published length of the program in which the student is enrolled or the credit or clock-hour equivalent.(7) Institutions of higher education shall award the student all need-based and merit-based financial aid for which the student would otherwise qualify. The Washington college bound scholarship is intended to replace unmet need, loans, and, at the student's option, work-study award before any other grants or scholarships are reduced.(8) The first scholarships shall be awarded to students graduating in 2012.(9) The eligible student has a property right in the award, but the state of Washington retains legal ownership of tuition units awarded as scholarships under this chapter until the tuition units are redeemed. These tuition units shall remain separately held from any tuition units owned under chapter 28B.95 RCW by a Washington college bound scholarship recipient.(10)(a) The scholarship award must be used within six years of receipt. Any unused scholarship tuition units revert to the Washington college bound scholarship account.(b) Should the recipient terminate his or her enrollment for any reason during the academic year, the unused portion of the scholarship tuition units shall revert to the Washington college bound scholarship account.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2025.--- END ---